Massachusetts, session 194th, H4368.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General
Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance, in consultation with the executive director of the Massachusetts
Water Resources Authority, may release by deed or other instrument for the benefit of Nora
LLC, owner of the premises located at 49 Charles Park road in the West Roxbury section of the
city of Boston, its successors or assigns, a portion of a sewer easement located on said real
of 3

property. The easement was taken by the office of metropolitan sewage commissioners for the
purpose of constructing, operating, maintaining, repairing and renewing sewers, drains,
manholes and underground appurtenances, dated June 5, 1897 and recorded with the Suffolk
county registry of deeds in book 2448, page 6. The portion of the easement to be released is
shown on a sketch entitled, “Proposed Surplus Sewer Easement 49 Charles Park Road, Boston”
dated August 24, 2019, which is on file with the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority and
the division of capital asset management and maintenance. The exact boundaries of the portion
of the easement to be released shall be determined by the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance, in consultation with the Massachusetts Water Resources
Authority, based upon a survey.
SECTION 2. The release authorized in section 1 shall be in accordance with such terms
and conditions as the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in
consultation with the executive director of the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority, shall
prescribe.
SECTION 3. The consideration for the release authorized in section 1 shall be the full
and fair market value as determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance based on an independent professional appraisal. The commissioner shall submit the
appraisal to the inspector general for review and comment. The inspector general shall review
such appraisal, including, but not limited to, an examination of the methodology utilized for the
appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare a report of such review and file the report with the
commissioner. The commissioner shall submit copies of the appraisal and the inspector general's
report and approval and comments, if any, to the house and senate committees on ways and
of 3

means and the joint committee on state administration and regulatory oversight prior to the
execution of documents affecting the release authorized by this act.
SECTION 4. Nora LLC, its successors or assigns shall be responsible for any costs for
surveys, appraisals, recording fees and other expenses relating to the release authorized in
section 1, as determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance.
of 3